Utah statutes.
10-2-411.   Disqualification of commission member -- Alternate member.
(1)  A member of the boundary commission is disqualified with respect to a
protest before the commission if that member owns property:
(a)  for a proposed annexation of an area located within a county of the first
class:
(i)  within the area proposed for annexation in a petition that is the subject
of the protest; or
(ii)  that is in the unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area proposed
for annexation in a petition that is the subject of a protest under Subsection
10-2-407(1)(a)(ii); or
(b)  for a proposed annexation of an area located in a specified county,
within the area proposed for annexation.
(2)  If a member is disqualified under Subsection (1), the body that appointed
the disqualified member shall appoint an alternate member to serve on the
commission for purposes of the protest as to which the member is disqualified.
